Alaska statutes. Title 19. Highways and Ferries.
Article 4. Roadside Memorials.

Sec. 19.25.260.
Roadside memorials permitted.

Notwithstanding AS

19.25.090

,

19.25.105

, and

19.25.200

, a person may, for a period of not more than two years, place in the right-of-way but outside of the traveled way of a state highway a temporary memorial for a decedent who died as a result of a traffic accident, or other incident in the right-of-way, at or reasonably near the site where the memorial is located.

A memorial must not interfere with the use of the highway, with other uses of the right-of-way, with the visibility of directional and other official signs and notices, or with highway safety, construction, or maintenance.

The person who places a memorial in the right-of-way of a state highway shall

post the person’s contact information on the memorial;

inform the department of the location within seven days of placement of the memorial; and

provide the person’s contact information to the department.

A person may not place a political or commercial message on a memorial.

A person may not place reflective material or another item on a memorial if that material or item would be distracting to drivers and other users of the right-of-way.

The state is not liable for damage to, or damage or injury resulting from the presence of, a memorial in the right-of-way of a state highway.

In this section, “memorial” means decorations, flags, flowers, and other lightweight objects or ornamentation commonly used at funerals or at gravesides as a tribute to a decedent.

History.

(§ 1 ch 125 SLA 2003)

Sec. 19.25.270.
Relocation or removal of memorial.

If, incidental to the construction or maintenance of a state highway, the department determines that a memorial authorized by AS

19.25.260

must be changed, relocated, or removed, the person who placed the memorial within the right-of-way shall change, relocate, or remove the memorial at no expense to the state within a reasonable time set by the department. If the owner does not change, relocate, or remove a memorial within the time set by the department, the memorial is an unauthorized encroachment and subject to the provisions of AS

19.25.230

—

19.25.250

.

If a memorial in the right-of-way of a state highway does not comply with the requirements of AS

19.25.260

, the memorial is an unauthorized encroachment. The department may require removal of the encroachment in the manner provided in AS

19.25.230

—

19.25.250

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 125 SLA 2003)